Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB743.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2109 of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2109. Acquisition of property.* * *(i) Just compensation.--A land bank that acquires real property under this section shall pay just compensation of the appraised value of the real property at the time of the transfer minus any fines, liens or remediation costs to the record owner of the real property.Section 2. Title 68 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2122. Municipal acquisition of real property.(a) Authorization.--A municipality may authorize a land bank 123456789101112131415161718 to acquire and redevelop real property if all of the following apply:(1) The property:(i) is abandoned or vacant and blighted, except for unimproved land, for five consecutive years; or(ii) is abandoned or vacant and has been declared a nuisance property by the municipality for five consecutive years.(2) The property has a record of building code violations or has been in serious violation of municipal ordinances, including tax delinquency.(3) The municipality has attempted at least three notifications by mail, including the first notification by certified mail, to the owner of the property to remediate the building code violations or ordinance violations.(b) Notification.--If the abandonment or vacancy and blight of the property continues after the requirements of subsection (a)(1), (2) and (3) have been established, the municipality shall notify the owner of the property by certified mail that the property is subject to be designated as available for acquisition through a land bank due to abandonment or vacancy and blight. Ninety days after the notification under this subsection has been delivered and if the owner has not requested an appeal hearing, the municipality may designate the property as available for acquisition through a land bank. Notification under this subsection shall include information on the appeal process established under subsection (c).(c) Appeal.--An owner of a property may appeal the designation of the property as available for acquisition through a land bank. A municipality shall provide a property owner a 20250HB0743PN0766 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hearing. A municipality may:(1) Grant an appeal if the owner of a property provides the municipality with a plan for the use or redevelopment of the property 30 days prior to an appeal hearing. The plan for use or redevelopment shall include a timeline for redevelopment, including scheduled dates when phases of the redevelopment are planned to be completed, the proposed final completion date, other information regarding the future plans for the property and at least one of the following:(i) actual or pending financing for redevelopment;(ii) architectural drawings for redevelopment; or(iii) a contract with a real estate developer, contractor or other professional for use or redevelopment of the property.(2) If an appeal is granted and a redevelopment plan is implemented, inspect a property at any time to ensure that the redevelopment plan is being implemented. If an inspection provides evidence that, without just cause, the redevelopment plan is not being implemented or is failing to meet the scheduled dates when phases of the redevelopment are planned to be completed, the municipality may revoke the appeal and designate the property as available for acquisition through a land bank.(3) If an owner provides evidence that an extension to a redevelopment plan is warranted, grant extensions to the plan in no more than six-month increments or designate the property as available for acquisition through a land bank.(d) Acquisition.--Following the designation of real property as available for acquisition through a land bank, a land bank may acquire the property under section 2109 (relating to 20250HB0743PN0766 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition of property).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0743PN0766 - 4 - 12